Missouri, session 2026, HB3424.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.910, to read as follows:
227.910. The portion of State Highway D from CST Quendo Avenue continuing
2 east to CST Sutter Avenue in St. Louis County shall be designated the "Mayor Mary
3 Louise Carter Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
4 appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private
5 donations.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.